Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 3 Third-party Claims

Law reviews.

For note discussing procedures by which one not an original party to an attachment may interpose a claim to the attached property, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-3-50.
Procedure generally.

When property is levied on by virtue of an attachment and the same is claimed by any person not a party to the attachment, it shall be the duty of the person claiming the same, his agent, or his attorney at law to make an oath before some person authorized by law to administer an oath that the property levied on is the property of the claimant and is not subject to the attachment according to the best of his knowledge and belief.

The claimant shall give bond, with good security, payable to the plaintiff in attachment in a sum not larger than double the amount of the attachment levied and, where the property attached is of less value than the attachment, in the judgment of the levying officer, then in double the value of the property conditioned to pay the plaintiff all damages which the jury, on the trial of the right of property, may assess against him in case it should be made to appear that the claim was made for the purpose of delay; and, in case the claim is interposed by the agent or attorney at law of the claimant, the agent or attorney at law shall have power to sign the name of the claimant to the bond, and the claimant shall be bound in the same manner as though he had signed it himself. It shall be the duty of the levying officer taking the affidavit and bond to return the same to the court to which the attachment is returnable, unless the property levied on should be real estate, in which case it shall be his duty to return the same to the superior court of the county where the land lies, provided that, if the claimant is unable to give such bond and security, he may interpose his claim as provided in Code Section 9-15-2.

History.

Laws 1814, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 72; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 34; Code 1863, § 3235; Code 1868, § 3246; Code 1873, § 3322; Code 1882, § 3322; Ga. L. 1887, p. 40, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4569; Civil Code 1910, § 5115; Code 1933, § 8-801.

Cross references.

Intervention generally, §

9-11-24

.

18-3-51.
Delivery of property to claimant upon payment of bond; return of affidavit and bond by levying officer.

The claimant, his agent, or his attorney at law may give bond, with good security, payable to the levying officer, in a sum equal to double the value of the property claimed, the value to be judged by the levying officer, conditioned to deliver the property at the time and place of sale, provided the same should be found subject to the attachment; and, upon the delivery of the bond to the levying officer, it shall be his duty to deliver such property to the claimant, his agent, or his attorney at law; and it shall be the duty of the levying officer to return the bond, together with the affidavit and claim bond, to the court to which the attachment is returnable; and, when the claim is interposed by the agent or attorney at law of the claimant, the agent or attorney at law shall have power to sign the name of the claimant to the bond, who shall be bound thereby in the same manner as though he had signed it himself.

History.

Laws 1836, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 84; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 36; Code 1863, § 3237; Code 1868, § 3248; Code 1873, § 3324; Code 1882, § 3324; Civil Code 1895, § 4571; Civil Code 1910, § 5117; Code 1933, § 8-803.

18-3-52.
Trial of claim.

The third-party claim shall be tried in the same manner and subject to the same rules and regulations as are prescribed by law for the trial of other claims in the court to which it is returned.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 35; Code 1863, § 3236; Code 1868, § 3247; Code 1873, § 3323; Code 1882, § 3323; Civil Code 1895, § 4570; Civil Code 1910, § 5116; Code 1933, § 8-802.

18-3-53.
Proceedings upon failure of claimant to deliver property pursuant to conditions of bond.

Upon the failure of the claimant to deliver the property according to the conditions of the bond, the levying officer may immediately sue the claimant and security upon the bond and recover the full value of the property claimed and also all damages, costs, and charges that the plaintiff may have sustained in consequence of the failure of the claimant to deliver the property.

History.

Laws 1836, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 84; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 37; Code 1863, § 3238; Code 1868, § 3249; Code 1873, § 3325; Code 1882, § 3325; Civil Code 1895, § 4572; Civil Code 1910, § 5118; Code 1933, § 8-804.

18-3-54.
Liability of claimant and surety on bond for hire or use of property where plaintiff’s debt unsatisfied.

In cases where the claimant shall deliver the property and upon selling the same a sufficient amount shall not be raised to pay the debt and costs of the plaintiff, the plaintiff may institute an action against the claimant and his securities upon his bond and recover the full value of the hire or use of the property while the same has been in the possession of the claimant and also full damages for any deterioration of the value of the property, by use or otherwise, while the same has been in the possession of the claimant, provided such recovery shall not exceed the amount of the debt that may remain due from the defendant in attachment to the plaintiff.

The remedy provided in this Code section is and shall be extended to all other claims in the cases herein provided for.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 25, § 38; Code 1863, § 3239; Code 1868, § 3250; Ga. L. 1873, p. 42, § 1; Code 1873, § 3326; Code 1882, § 3326; Civil Code 1895, § 4573; Civil Code 1910, § 5119; Code 1933, § 8-805.

18-3-55.
Interposition of claim before or after judgment.

In cases of attachment, the claim may be interposed either before or after judgment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3240; Code 1868, § 3251; Code 1873, § 3327; Code 1882, § 3327; Civil Code 1895, § 4574; Civil Code 1910, § 5120; Code 1933, § 8-806.